Utah statutes.
53-2-506.   Duties of participating political subdivisions.
Each participating political subdivision shall:
(1)  identify potential hazards that could affect the participating political
subdivision;
(2)  conduct joint planning, intelligence sharing, and threat assessment
development with contiguous participating political subdivisions and conduct
joint training with them at least biennially;
(3)  identify and inventory the services, equipment, supplies, personnel, and
other resources related to participating political subdivision's planning,
prevention, mitigation, response, and recovery activities; and
(4)  adopt and implement the standardized incident management system approved
by the division.
